Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1138.
do enact as follows:AB1138,11Section 1. 799.24 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 799.24 (3) (a) and 2amended to read:AB1138,2,93799.24 (3) (a) Prior to the entry of judgment, upon stipulation of the parties to 4a schedule for compliance with the stipulation, the court or circuit court 5commissioner may enter a stipulated judgment of dismissal in lieu thereof. Any 6Except as provided in par. (b), any such judgment may be vacated without notice to 7the obligated party, and the unsatisfied portion thereof entered, upon application 8by the prevailing party and proof by affidavit of noncompliance with the terms of 9the stipulation.AB1138,210Section 2. 799.24 (3) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB1138,2,1511799.24 (3) (b) If a stipulated judgment of dismissal is entered under par. (a) in 12an action for eviction, the court or circuit court commissioner may vacate the 13stipulated judgment only if prior written notice is provided to the obligated party. 14The court or circuit court commissioner may not enter the unsatisfied portion of the 15stipulated judgment unless all of the following occur:AB1138,2,18161. The prevailing party applies for such entry, files proof by affidavit of 17noncompliance with the terms of the stipulation, and files proof that proper notice 18has been provided.AB1138,3,112. The court or circuit court commissioner holds an evidentiary hearing.AB1138,3,22